New Mexico, session 2026, SB232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. [NEW MATERIAL] DETERMINATION OF COMPETENCY OF A CHILD.-- A. The question of competency of a child may be raised by the court or by written motion of either party to the proceeding, accompanied by any documents supporting the motion. B. The court may order a determination of a child's competency if the court finds that a compelling reason exists to evaluate and determine competency. The age of the child shall not alone be a compelling reason. C. When determining competency for a child defendant, the child shall be presumed to be competent. D. Upon the court ordering a determination of competency of a child, the child's competency shall be evaluated by an independent child psychologist recognized by the court as an expert. E. The determination of competency shall include: (1) an evaluation of the child's ability to understand relevant information; (2) an assessment of the child's ability to appreciate the consequences of choices; (3) a measurement of the child's reasoning skills in weighing options and outcomes; and (4) the child's ability to express a choice clearly. F. As used in this section, "child" means a person under eighteen years of age. - 2 -